Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,256
Environmental audit; use as evidence prohibited; exceptions.

(1) An environmental audit prepared under sections 25-21,254 to 25-21,264 is not admissible as evidence in any civil or administrative proceeding or enforcement proceedings under local ordinances, except (a) as provided in sections 25-21,257 to 25-21,259, (b) an agency having regulatory authority may obtain and review such audit for the limited purposes of determining if the audit exists and if any exceptions to the liability provisions of sections 25-21,254 to 25-21,264 exist with respect to the audit, (c) with respect to the generation, storage, transport, or disposal of radioactive material, low-level radioactive waste, and high-level radioactive waste as defined in section 71-3503, and (d) no protections are given under this section with respect to violations which would likely result or have resulted in a significant adverse impact on the public health or the environment.

(2) Neither any person who conducted the audit nor any person to whom the audit results are disclosed can be compelled to testify regarding any matter which was the subject of the audit and which is addressed in the environmental audit.

Laws 1998, LB 395, § 3.